src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_ettad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - ettâđ: # 
    ettâđ+V+Inf: ettâđ
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: eeđâm
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: eeđah
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iätá
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: etteen
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: etâvettee
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ettâv
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ettâp
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: etâvetteđ
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: eteh
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ettim
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ettih
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: eeđâi
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: eeđáim
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: eeđáid
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: eeđáin
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: eeđâim
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: eeđâid
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ettii
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: eđâččim
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: eđâččih
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: eđâččij
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: eđâččáim
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: eđâččáid
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: eđâččáin
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: eđâččijm
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: eđâččijd
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: eđâččii
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: eeđeem
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: eeđeeh
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: eeđâš
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: eđâžeen
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: eeđâšvettee
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: eđâžává
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: eđâžep
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: eeđâšvetteđ
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: eđâžeh
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: eeđâ
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: iäđus
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: iättoon
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: ettee
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: iättus
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: iättup
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ettâđ
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: iättus
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: eeđâ
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ettâm
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: eđâččii
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: eeđii
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+ConNeg: eeđâ
    ettâđ+V+PrsPrc: ettee
    ettâđ+V+PrfPrc: ettâm
    ettâđ+V+Actio+Nom: ettâm
    ettâđ+V+Actio+Ess: etâmin
    ettâđ+V+Actio+Loc: etâmist
    ettâđ+V+Actio+Ill: etâmân
    ettâđ+V+Ger: eđâdijn
    ettâđ+V+VAbess: eđâhánnáá
